test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-lex_supmus_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - ucemus: # ok MLO
    ucemus+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ucemus
    ucemus+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: ucemuu
    ucemus+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: ucemuu
    ucemus+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: ucemusân
    ucemus+A+Superl+Sg+Loc: ucemuust
    ucemus+A+Superl+Sg+Com: ucemuin
    ucemus+A+Superl+Sg+Abe: ucemuuttáá
    ucemus+A+Superl+Ess: ucemussân
    ucemus+A+Superl+Par: ucemussâd
    ucemus+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: ucemuuh
    ucemus+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: ucemui
    ucemus+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: ucemuid
    ucemus+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: ucemuid
    ucemus+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: ucemuin
    ucemus+A+Superl+Pl+Com: ucemuiguin
    ucemus+A+Superl+Pl+Abe: ucemuittáá 
